Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-131
Safety regulations.

A second-class city shall have power to prescribe the thickness, strength, and manner of constructing stone, brick and other buildings, and to prescribe and direct the number and construction of means of exit and entrance and the construction of fire escapes.

Laws 1881, c. 24, § 1, p. 196;

R.S.1913, § 5025;

C.S.1922, § 4194;

C.S.1929, § 17-133;

R.S.1943, § 17-131.